Hawaii statutes.
[§587A-20] Inadmissibility of evidence in
other state actions or proceedings. The court may order that testimony or
other evidence produced by a party in a proceeding under this chapter shall be
inadmissible as evidence in any other state civil or criminal action or
proceeding if the court deems such an order to be in the best interests of the
child. [L 2010, c 135, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next